Utah statutes.
49-17-405.   Annual cost-of-living adjustment.

(1)  The office shall make an annual cost-of-living adjustment to:

(a)  an allowance paid under Section 49-17-402 and Part 5, Death Benefit, of this chapter if the benefit has been paid for at least one year; and

(b)  a payment made to an alternate payee under a domestic relations order, if the payment is to be paid as a percentage of the allowance rather than a specific dollar amount.

(2) (a)  The allowance shall be increased by the annual increase in the Consumer Price Index up to a maximum of 4%.

(b)  Annual increases in the Consumer Price Index in excess of 4% shall be accumulated and used in subsequent adjustments when the annual increase in the Consumer Price Index is less than 4%.

(3)  The Consumer Price Index used in calculating adjustments shall be a United States Bureau of Labor Statistics Consumer Price Index average as determined by the board.

(4)  The cost-of-living adjustment made under this section may not decrease the allowance.

